California statutes. Civil Code
(1) For a buyer who is a senior citizen: “You, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to midnight of the fifth business day after the date of this transaction. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.”

(2) For all
 other buyers: “You, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to midnight of the third business day after the date of this transaction. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.”

(b) The agreement or offer to purchase shall contain on the first page, in a type size no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, each of the following:

(1) The name, address, and email address of the seller to which the notice is to be sent.

(2) The date the buyer signed the agreement or offer to purchase.

(3) The telephone number of the seller, or the seller’s representative, to assist the buyer with locating and filling out the “Notice of Cancellation.”

(c) (1) The agreement or offer to purchase shall be accompanied by a completed form in duplicate, captioned “Notice of Cancellation,” which shall be attached to the agreement or offer to purchase and be easily detachable, and which shall contain in type of at least 10-point, the following statement written in the same language, e.g., Spanish, as used in the contract:

“Notice of Cancellation”/enter date of transaction/(Date)You may cancel this transaction, without any penalty or obligation, within three business days from the above date.

If you cancel, any property traded in, any payments made by you under the contract or sale, and any negotiable instrument executed by you will be returned within 10 days following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be canceled.

If you cancel, you must make available to the seller at your residence, in substantially as good condition as when received, any goods delivered to you under this contract or sale, or you
 may, if you wish, comply with the instructions of the seller regarding the return shipment of the goods at the seller’s expense and risk.

If you do make the goods available to the seller and the seller does not pick them up within 20 days of the date of your notice of cancellation, you may retain or dispose of the goods without any further obligation. If you fail to make the goods available to the seller, or if you agree to return the goods to the seller and fail to do so, then you remain liable for performance of all obligations under the contract.

To cancel this transaction, email, mail, or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice, or any other written notice, or send a telegram to___________________at/name of seller//Address of sellers place of business/not later than midnight of (Date)I hereby cancel this transaction(Date)(Buyer’s signature)(2) The reference to “three” in the statement set forth in paragraph (1) shall be changed to “five” for a buyer who is a senior citizen.

(d) The seller shall provide the buyer with a copy of the contract or offer to purchase and the attached notice of cancellation, and shall inform the buyer orally of the buyer’s right to cancel at the time the seminar sales solicitation contract or offer is executed.

(e) Until the seller has complied with this section, the buyer may cancel the seminar sales solicitation contract or offer.

(f) “Contract or sale” as used in subdivision (c), means “seminar sales solicitation contract or offer” as defined by Section 1689.24.

(g) The five-day right to cancel added
 by the act that added paragraph (1) to subdivision (a) and added paragraph (2) to subdivision (c) shall apply to contracts entered into or offers to purchase conveyed on or after January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 348, Sec. 6.   (AB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1689.22.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1689.20 and 1689.21, within 10 days after a seminar sales solicitation contract or offer has been cancelled, the seller must tender to the buyer any payments made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness.

(b) If the downpayment includes goods traded in, the goods must be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received.

(c) Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by Sections 1689.20 and 1689.21, the buyer may retain
possession of goods delivered to him or her by the seller and has a lien on the goods for any recovery to which he or she is entitled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 724, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1689.23.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 1689.22, within 20 days after a seminar sales solicitation contract or offer has been canceled, the buyer, upon demand, must tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale or offer, but he or she is not obligated to tender at any place other than his or her own address. If the seller fails to demand possession of goods within 20 days after cancellation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to pay for them.

(b) The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the
goods in his or her possession, both prior to cancellation and during the 20-day period following. During the 20-day period after cancellation, except for the buyer’s duty of care, the goods are at the seller’s risk.

(c) If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a seminar sales solicitation contract or offer prior to its cancellation, the seller is entitled to no compensation. If the seller’s services result in the alteration of property of the buyer, the seller shall restore the property to substantially as good condition as it was at the time the services were rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1689.24.

As used in Sections 1689.20 to 1689.23, inclusive:

(a) “Seminar sales solicitation contract or offer” means any contract, whether single or multiple, or any offer which is subject to approval, for the sale, lease, or rental of goods or services or both, made using selling techniques in a seminar setting in an amount of twenty-five dollars ($25) or more, including any interest or service charges. “Seminar sales solicitation contract” does not include any contract under which the buyer has the right to rescind pursuant to Title 1, Chapter 2, Section 125 of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act (Public Law 90-321) and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto or any contract which contains a written and dated statement signed by the
 prospective buyer stating that the negotiation between the parties was initiated by the prospective buyer.

(b) “Seminar setting” means premises other than the residence of the buyer.

(c) “Goods” means tangible chattels bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, including certificates or coupons exchangeable for these goods, and including goods which, at the time of the sale or subsequently, are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part of the real property whether or not severable therefrom, but does not include any vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, nor any goods sold with a vehicle if sold under a contract governed by Section 2982, and does not include any mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, nor any goods sold with a mobilehome if either are sold under a contract subject to Section
 18036.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Services” means work, labor and services, including, but not limited to, services furnished in connection with the repair, alteration, or improvement of residential premises, or services furnished in connection with the sale or repair of goods as defined in Section 1802.1, and courses of instruction, regardless of the purpose for which they are taken, but does not include the services of attorneys, real estate brokers and salesmen, securities dealers or investment counselors, physicians, optometrists, or dentists, nor financial services offered by banks, savings institutions, credit unions, industrial loan companies, personal property brokers, consumer finance lenders, or commercial finance lenders, organized pursuant to state or federal law, which are not connected with the sale of goods or services, as defined herein, nor the sale of insurance which is not connected with the
 sale of goods or services as defined herein, nor services in connection with the sale or installation of mobilehomes or of goods sold with a mobilehome if either are sold or installed under a contract subject to Section 18036.5 of the Health and Safety Code, nor services for which the tariffs, rates, charges, costs, or expenses, including in each instance the time sale price, is required by law to be filed with and approved by the federal government or any official, department, division, commission, or agency of the United States or of the State of California.

(e) “Business day” means any calendar day except Sunday, or the following business holidays: New Year’s Day, Washington’s Birthday, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans’ Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day.

(f) “Senior citizen” means an individual who is 65 years of age or
 older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 158, Sec. 10.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1690.

A stipulation that errors of description shall not avoid a contract, or shall be the subject of compensation, or both, does not take away the right of rescission for fraud, nor for mistake, where such mistake is in a matter essential to the inducement of the contract, and is not capable of exact and entire compensation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1691.

Subject to Section 1693, to effect a rescission a party to the contract must, promptly upon discovering the facts which entitle him to rescind if he is free from duress, menace, undue influence or disability and is aware of his right to rescind:

(a) Give notice of rescission to the party as to whom he rescinds; and

(b) Restore to the other party everything of value which he has received from him under the contract or offer to restore the same upon condition that the other party do likewise, unless the latter is unable or positively refuses to
do so. 

When notice of rescission has not otherwise been given or an offer to restore the benefits received under the contract has not otherwise been made, the service of a pleading in an action or proceeding that seeks relief based on rescission shall be deemed to be such notice or offer or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------

1692.

When a contract has been rescinded in whole or in part, any party to the contract may seek relief based upon such rescission by (a) bringing an action to recover any money or thing owing to him by any other party to the contract as a consequence of such rescission or for any other relief to which he may be entitled under the circumstances or (b) asserting such rescission by way of defense or cross-complaint.

If in an action or proceeding a party seeks relief based upon rescission and the court determines that the contract has not been rescinded, the court may grant any party to the
action any other relief to which he may be entitled under the circumstances.

A claim for damages is not inconsistent with a claim for relief based upon rescission. The aggrieved party shall be awarded complete relief, including restitution of benefits, if any, conferred by him as a result of the transaction and any consequential damages to which he is entitled; but such relief shall not include duplicate or inconsistent items of recovery.

If in an action or proceeding a party seeks relief based upon rescission, the court may require the party to whom such relief is granted to make any compensation to the other which justice may require and may otherwise in its judgment adjust the equities between the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

1693.

When relief based upon rescission is claimed in an action or proceeding, such relief shall not be denied because of delay in giving notice of rescission unless such delay has been substantially prejudicial to the other party.

A party who has received benefits by reason of a contract that is subject to rescission and who in an action or proceeding seeks relief based upon rescission shall not be denied relief because of a delay in restoring or in tendering restoration of such benefits before judgment unless such delay has been substantially prejudicial to the other party; but the court may make a tender of restoration a condition of
its judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 589.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Dating Service Contracts [1694. - 1694.4.]

1694.

(a) As used in this chapter, a dating service contract is any contract with any organization that offers dating, matrimonial, or social referral services by any of the following means:

(1) An exchange of names, telephone numbers, addresses, and statistics.

(2) A photograph or video
selection process.

(3) Personal introductions provided by the organization at its place of business.

(4) A social environment provided by the organization intended primarily as an alternative to other singles’ bars or club-type environments.

(b) As used in this chapter, an “online dating service” means any person or organization engaged in the business of offering dating, matrimonial, or social referral services online, where the services are offered primarily online, such as by means of an Internet Web site or a mobile application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (AB 314)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.1.

(a) In addition to any other right to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a dating service contract or offer, until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase those services.

(b) (1) Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of
cancellation by mail, telegram, or delivery to the seller at the address specified in the agreement or offer.

(2) In the case of a dating service contract with an online dating service, cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation by email to an email address provided by the seller. Additional electronic means of cancellation may be provided by the agreement or offer.

(c) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when deposited in the mail properly addressed with postage prepaid.

(d) Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take the particular form as provided in the contract or offer to purchase and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the dating service contract.

(e) All moneys paid pursuant to any contract for dating services shall be refunded within 10 days of receipt of the notice of cancellation.

(f) The buyer may notify the dating service of his or her intent to cancel the contract within the three-day period specified in this section and stop the processing of a credit card voucher or check by telephone notification to the dating service. However, this does not negate the obligation of the buyer to cancel the contract by mail, email or other electronic means, telegram, or delivery as required pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 578, Sec. 2.   (AB 314)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.2.

(a) A dating service contract shall be in writing, which, in the case of an online dating service contract, may be an electronic writing made available for viewing online. A copy of the contract shall be provided to the buyer at the time he or she signs the contract, except that an online dating service shall not be required to provide a copy of the contract where (1) the contract is available through a direct link
that is provided in a clear and conspicuous manner on the Internet Web site page where the buyer provides consent to the agreement and, (2) upon request by the buyer, the online dating service provides a PDF format or retainable digital copy of the contract.

(b) (1) Every dating service contract shall contain on its face, and in close proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the buyer, a conspicuous statement in a size equal to at least 10-point boldface type, as follows:

“You, the buyer, may cancel this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at any time prior to midnight of the original contract seller’s third business day following the date of this contract, excluding Sundays and holidays. To cancel this agreement, mail or deliver a signed and dated notice, or send a telegram which states that you, the buyer, are canceling this agreement, or words of
similar effect. This notice shall be sent to:(Name of the business that sold you the contract)(Address of the business that sold you the contract).”(2) Paragraph (1) shall not otherwise apply to an online dating service if the online dating service contract includes the statement in paragraph (1) in a clear and conspicuous manner in a stand-alone first paragraph of the contract.

(c) (1) The dating service contract shall contain on the first page, in a type size no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, the name and address of the dating service operator to which the notice of cancellation is to be mailed, and the date the buyer signed the contract.

(2) In the case of an online dating service contract, if the name of the dating service operator and the email address that can be used for cancellation appears in the first paragraph of the contract, in a type size no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, the other requirements of paragraph (1) shall not apply.

(d) (1) No dating service contract shall require payments or financing by the buyer over a period in excess of two years from the date the contract is entered into, nor shall the term of any such
contract be measured by the life of the buyer. However, the services to be rendered to the buyer under the contract may extend over a period beginning within six months and ending within three years of the date the contract is entered into.

(2) In the case of an online dating service contract, if the initial term is one year or less, and subsequent terms are one year or less, paragraph (1) shall not apply. 

(e) If a dating service contract is not in compliance with this chapter, the buyer may, at any time, cancel the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   (AB 314)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.3.

(a) Every dating service contract shall contain language providing that:

(1) If by reason of death or disability the buyer is unable to receive all services for which the buyer has contracted, the buyer and the buyer’s estate may elect to be relieved of the obligation to make payments for services other than those received before death or the onset of
disability, except as provided in paragraph (4).

(2) If the buyer has prepaid any amount for services, so much of the amount prepaid that is allocable to services that the buyer has not received shall be promptly refunded to the buyer or his or her representative.

(3) “Disability” means a condition which precludes the buyer from physically using the services specified in the contract during the term of disability and the condition is verified in writing by a physician designated and remunerated by the buyer. The written verification of the physician shall be presented to the seller.

(4) If the physician determines that the duration of the disability will be less than six months, the seller may extend the term of the contract for a period of six months at no additional charge to the buyer in lieu of cancellation.

(b) (1) If the buyer relocates his or her primary residence further than 50 miles from the dating service office and is unable to transfer the contract to a comparable facility, the buyer may elect to be relieved of the obligation to make payment for services other than those received prior to that relocation, and if the buyer has prepaid any amount for dating services, so much of the amount prepaid that is allocable to services that the buyer has not received shall be promptly refunded to the buyer. A buyer who elects to be relieved of further obligation pursuant to this subdivision may be charged a predetermined fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) or, if more than half the life of the contract has expired, a predetermined fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to online dating services that are generally available to
users on a regional, national, or global basis.

(c) In addition to any other requirements, online dating services shall also maintain both of the following features:

(1) A reference or link to dating safety awareness information that includes, at a minimum, a list or descriptions of safety measures reasonably aimed at increasing awareness of safer dating practices.

(2) A means to report issues or concerns relating to the behavior of other users of the online dating service arising out of their use of the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 578, Sec. 4.   (AB 314)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.4.

(a) Any contract for dating services which does not comply with this chapter is void and unenforceable.

(b) Any contract for dating services entered into under willful and fraudulent or misleading information or advertisements of the seller is void and unenforceable.

(c) Any buyer injured by a violation of this chapter may bring an action for the recovery of damages in a court of competent jurisdiction. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed.
Reasonable attorney fees may be awarded to the prevailing party.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, whenever the contract price is payable in installments and the buyer is relieved from making further payments or entitled to a refund under this chapter, the buyer shall be entitled to receive a refund or refund credit of that portion of the cash price as is allocable to the services not actually received by the buyer. The refund of any finance charge shall be computed according to the “sum of the balance method,” also known as the “Rule of 78.”

(e) Any waiver by the buyer of this chapter is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 138, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. Weight Loss Contracts [1694.5. - 1694.9.]

1694.5.

(a) As used in this chapter, a weight loss contract is a contract with any weight loss program or center that offers any of the following:

(1) Instruction, counseling, supervision, or assistance in weight reduction, body shaping, diet, and eating habits, by persons who are not licensed health care professionals.

(2) Use of facilities of a weight loss center for any of the purposes specified in paragraph (1).

(3) Membership in any group,
club, association, or organization formed for any of the purposes specified in paragraph (1).

(4) Prepackaged, or premeasured “diet foods” provided by the weight loss program or center.

(b) This chapter does not apply to any contract for health studio services as defined in Section 1812.81.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.6.

(a) In addition to any other right to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a weight loss contract or offer until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase those services.

(b) Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation by mail, telegram, or delivery to the seller at the address specified in the agreement or offer.

(c) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when deposited in the mail properly addressed with postage prepaid.

(d) Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take the particular form as provided in the contract or offer to purchase and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the weight loss contract.

(e) All moneys paid pursuant to any weight loss contract shall be refunded within 10 days of receipt of the notice of cancellation.

(f) The buyer may notify the weight loss program of his or her intent to cancel the contract within the three-day period specified in this section and stop the processing of a credit card voucher or check by telephone notification to the weight loss program. However, this does not negate the
obligation of the buyer to cancel the contract by mail, telegram, or delivery as required pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.7.

(a) A weight loss contract shall be in writing. A copy of the contract shall be provided to the buyer at the time he or she signs the contract.

(b) Every weight loss contract shall contain on its face, and in close proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the buyer, a conspicuous statement in a size equal to at least 10-point boldface type, as follows:

“You, the buyer, may cancel this agreement, without any
penalty or obligation, at any time prior to midnight of the original contract seller’s third business day following the date of this contract, excluding Sundays and holidays. To cancel this agreement, mail or deliver a signed and dated notice, or send a telegram which states that you, the buyer, are canceling this agreement, or words of similar effect. This notice shall be sent to:(Name of the business that sold you the contract)(Address of the business that sold you the contract).”(c) The weight loss contract shall contain on the first page, in a type size no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, the name and address of the weight loss program operator to which the notice of cancellation is to be mailed; and the date the buyer signed the contract.

(d) No weight loss contract shall require payments or financing by the buyer over a period in excess of two years from the date the contract is entered into, nor shall the term of any such contract be measured by the life of the buyer. The services to be rendered to the buyer under the contract shall not extend for more than three years after the date the contract is entered into.

(e) If a weight loss contract is not in compliance with this chapter, the buyer may, at any time, cancel the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 359, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.8.

Every weight loss contract shall contain language providing that:

(a) If by reason of death or disability the buyer is unable to receive all services for which the buyer has contracted, the buyer and the buyer’s estate may elect to be relieved of the obligation to make payments for services other than those received before death or the onset of disability, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(1) If the buyer has prepaid any amount for services, so much of the amount prepaid that is allocable to services that the buyer has
not received shall be promptly refunded to the buyer or his or her representative.

(2) “Disability” means a condition which precludes the buyer from physically using the services specified in the contract during the term of disability and the condition is verified in writing by a physician designated and remunerated by the buyer. The written verification of the physician shall be presented to the seller.

(3) If the physician determines that the duration of the disability will be less than six months, the seller may extend the term of the contract for a period of six months at no additional charge to the buyer in lieu of cancellation.

(b) If the buyer relocates his or her primary residence further than 50 miles from the weight loss center and is unable to transfer the contract to a comparable facility, the buyer may
elect to be relieved of the obligation to make payment for services other than those received prior to that relocation, and if the buyer has prepaid any amount for weight loss services, so much of the amount prepaid that is allocable to services that the buyer has not received shall be promptly refunded to the buyer. A buyer who elects to be relieved of further obligation pursuant to this subdivision may be charged a predetermined fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) or, if more than half the life of the contract has expired, a predetermined fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.9.

(a) Any contract for weight loss services which does not comply with this chapter is void and unenforceable.

(b) Any contract for weight loss services entered into under willful and fraudulent or misleading information or advertisements of the seller is void and unenforceable.

(c) Any buyer injured by a violation of this chapter may bring an action for the recovery of damages in a court of competent jurisdiction. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed
if the violation is willful. Reasonable attorney fees may be awarded to the prevailing party.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, whenever the contract price is payable in installments and the buyer is relieved from making further payments or entitled to a refund under this chapter, the buyer shall be entitled to receive a refund or refund credit of that portion of the cash price as is allocable to the services not actually received by the buyer. The refund of any finance charge shall be computed according to the “sum of the balance method,” also known as the “Rule of 78.”

(e) Any waiver by the buyer of this chapter is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Home Equity Sales Contracts [1695. - 1695.17.]

1695.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that homeowners whose residences are in foreclosure have been subjected to fraud, deception, and unfair dealing by home equity purchasers. The recent rapid escalation of home values, particularly in the urban areas, has resulted in a significant increase in home equities which are usually the greatest financial asset held by the homeowners of this state. During the time period between the commencement of foreclosure proceedings and the scheduled foreclosure sale date, homeowners in financial distress, especially the poor, elderly, and financially unsophisticated, are vulnerable to the importunities of equity
purchasers who induce homeowners to sell their homes for a small fraction of their fair market values through the use of schemes which often involve oral and written misrepresentations, deceit, intimidation, and other unreasonable commercial practices.

(b) The Legislature declares that it is the express policy of the state to preserve and guard the precious asset of home equity, and the social as well as the economic value of homeownership.

(c) The Legislature further finds that equity purchasers have a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities, and therefore the provisions of this chapter are necessary to promote the public welfare.

(d) The intent and purposes of this chapter are the following:

(1) To
provide each homeowner with information necessary to make an informed and intelligent decision regarding the sale of his or her home to an equity purchaser; to require that the sales agreement be expressed in writing; to safeguard the public against deceit and financial hardship; to insure, foster, and encourage fair dealing in the sale and purchase of homes in foreclosure; to prohibit representations that tend to mislead; to prohibit or restrict unfair contract terms; to afford homeowners a reasonable and meaningful opportunity to rescind sales to equity purchasers; and to preserve and protect home equities for the homeowners of this state.

(2) This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate this intent and to achieve these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1029.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.1.

The following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Equity purchaser” means any person who acquires title to any residence in foreclosure, except a person who acquires such title as follows:

(1) For the purpose of using such property as a personal residence.

(2) By a deed in lieu of foreclosure of any voluntary lien or encumbrance of record.

(3) By a deed from a
trustee acting under the power of sale contained in a deed of trust or mortgage at a foreclosure sale conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2920) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3.

(4) At any sale of property authorized by statute.

(5) By order or judgment of any court.

(6) From a spouse, blood relative, or blood relative of a spouse.

(b) “Residence in foreclosure” and “residential real property in foreclosure” means residential real property consisting of one- to four-family dwelling units, one of which the owner occupies as his or her principal place of residence, and against which there is an outstanding notice of default, recorded pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2920) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part
4 of Division 3.

(c) “Equity seller” means any seller of a residence in foreclosure.

(d) “Business day” means any calendar day except Sunday, or the following business holidays: New Year’s Day, Washington’s Birthday, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans’ Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day.

(e) “Contract” means any offer or any contract, agreement, or arrangement, or any term thereof, between an equity purchaser and equity seller incident to the sale of a residence in foreclosure.

(f) “Property owner” means the record title owner of the residential real property in foreclosure at the time the notice of default was recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 423, Sec. 4.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.2.

Every contract shall be written in letters of a size equal to 10-point bold type, in the same language principally used by the equity purchaser and equity seller to negotiate the sale of the residence in foreclosure and shall be fully completed and signed and dated by the equity seller and equity purchaser prior to the execution of any instrument of conveyance of the residence in foreclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1029.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.3.

Every contract shall contain the entire agreement of the parties and shall include the following terms:

(a) The name, business address, and the telephone number of the equity purchaser.

(b) The address of the residence in foreclosure.

(c) The total consideration to be given by the equity purchaser in connection with or incident to the sale.

(d) A complete description
of the terms of payment or other consideration including, but not limited to, any services of any nature which the equity purchaser represents he will perform for the equity seller before or after the sale.

(e) The time at which possession is to be transferred to the equity purchaser. 

(f) The terms of any rental agreement.

(g) A notice of cancellation as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1695.5. 

(h) The following notice in at least 14-point boldface type, if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed, and completed with the name of the equity purchaser, immediately above the statement required by Section 1695.5(a):
“NOTICE REQUIRED BY CALIFORNIA LAWUntil your right to cancel this contract has ended,(Name)or anyone working for (Name)
 CANNOT ask you to sign or have you sign any deed or any other document.”

The contract required by this section shall survive delivery of any instrument of conveyance of the residence in foreclosure, and shall have no effect on persons other than the parties to the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 423, Sec. 5.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.4.

(a) In addition to any other right of rescission, the equity seller has the right to cancel any contract with an equity purchaser until midnight of the fifth business day following the day on which the equity seller signs a contract that complies with this chapter or until 8 a.m. on the day scheduled for the sale of the property pursuant to a power of sale conferred in a deed of trust, whichever occurs first.

(b) Cancellation occurs when the equity seller personally
delivers written notice of cancellation to the address specified in the contract or sends a telegram indicating cancellation to that address.

(c) A notice of cancellation given by the equity seller need not take the particular form as provided with the contract and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the equity seller not to be bound by the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 50, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.5.

(a) The contract shall contain in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the equity seller’s signature a conspicuous statement in a size equal to at least 12-point bold type, if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed, as follows: “You may cancel this
contract for the sale of your house with­out any penalty or obligation at any time before(Date and time of day).See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.”The equity purchaser shall accurately enter the date and time of day on which the rescission right ends.(b) The contract shall be accompanied by a completed form in duplicate, captioned “notice of cancellation” in a size equal to 12-point bold type, if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed, followed by a space in which the equity purchaser shall enter the date on which the equity seller executes any contract. This form shall be attached to the contract, shall be easily detachable, and shall
contain in type of at least 10-point, if the contract is printed or in capital letters if the contract is typed, the following statement written in the same language as used in the contract:“NOTICE OF CANCELLATION(Enter date contract signed)You may cancel this contract for the sale of your house, without any penalty or obligation, at any time before(Enter date and time of day).To cancel this transaction, personally deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice, or send a telegramto (Name of purchaser),at (Street address of purchaser’s place of business)NOT LATER THAN (Enter date and time of day) .I hereby cancel this transaction (Date) .(Seller’s signature)”(c) The equity purchaser shall provide the equity seller with a copy of the contract and the attached notice of cancellation.

(d) Until the equity purchaser has complied with this section, the